dictsource/ms_rules
// Last updated: 14 October 2010, Jason Ong (jason@portalgroove.com)
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Malay

.group a
        a        a
     a) a        _|a
    A_) a        _|a
    au) a        _|a
        ai       aI
        au       aU
		
		
	_) au	o		// (automatik)

	@) a (_	@		// (pula)
	@) a (kah_ '@	// (apakah)
	@) a (kan_	'@	// (bukakan)
	@) a (lah_ 	'@	// (mintalah)
	@) a (nya_ '@	// (puncanya)
	@) a (pun_ '@ 	// (bagaimanapun)


.group b
        b        b

     _) be (@@   b@

	 _) ber (@@		b@R		// (berdasarkan)
	 _) ber (CaiX	b@R		// (bermain)
	 _) ber (CauX	b@R		// (bergaul, berbaur)
	 _) berke (@@	b@Rk@	// (berkeliaran, berkesempatan)
	 _) berle (@@	b@Rl@	// (berleluasa)
	 _) berper (@@  b@Rp@R	// 
	 _) berse (@@ 	b@Rs@	// (bersebelahan)
	 _) bh	b	// added (kota bharu)

.group c
        c       tS
		
		//*************
		
		ch		tS	// (kuching)
		//**************

.group d
        d        d
        dj       dZ     // Dutch

.group e
        e        E		//jason: E changed to E2
     e) e        _|E
    A_) e        _|E	// *** to check on this ***
        e (_     e


// *********************
	 _) e (Co@	 E2		// e-o (ekoran)
	 
		e (CaiX	'@		// e-ai	(kedai, petai, belai, cerai)
	
		e (CiX	'@		// e-i (betik, ketil, lebih, kerisik, kesedihan, sering, seri, segi, seni)
		e (CCiX '@		// e-i (penting, jentik)		
		e (CCuX '@		// e-u (dibendung, bentuk)
		e (CuX	'@		// e-u (belut, telur, perut, ketulan, bertemu)
		e (CCuX '@		// e-u (perlu, merdu)
		e (CCCuX '@		// e-u (tengku, tengkuk)

		e (nyuX '@		// e-u (senyum)
   eCC) e (X	e		// e-e (pendek, benteng)	
	eC)	e (X	e		// e-e (belek, gelek, leceh, geleng)
		e (Ce	e		// e-e (kelecehan)
	oC) e (X	e		// o-e (oleh, boleh, celoteh, topeng)
   oCC) e (X 	e		// o-e (ponteng)
   
     C) e (CCCoCkan_	e 	// (bengkokkan)
     m) e (_	@		// (autisme) 
	  
 

// ******************
		
		
.group f
        f        f
        ff       f

.group g
        g        g

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        i
     i) i        _|i
    A_) i        _|i
	

	@) i (CX	 e		// (tekik, masing, masin)
	@) i (Cnya_ 'e		// (masinnya)
	@) i (CCaan_ e		// (pemeriksaan)

.group j
        j        dZ

.group k
        k        k
        k (_     ?
        kh       x

     _) ke (@@   k@
	@@) k (annya_	k'
	
	_) kese (@@	 k@s@  // keseluruhannya
	
	

.group l
        l        l
        ll       l

.group m
        m        m

     _) me (@@   m@
     _) mempe (@    m@mp@
	 
	 //*****************
	 _) mem (@@	 m@m
	 _) mene (@@ m@n@	// (menerajui)
	 _) menge (@@ m@N@	// (mengenepikan)
	 _) mempenge (@@ m@mp@N@	// (mempengerusikan)
	 //****************

.group n
        n        n
        ng       N
        ny       n^
//        nj       n^

.group o
        o        o
     o) o        _|o
    A_) o        _|o
        o (r     O
        oe       u        // Dutch spelling

.group p
        p        p
        pp       p

     _) pe (@@   p@

	 
	 _) pe (CaiX	p@			// (pemain, pesaing)
	 _) peme (@@	p@m@		// (pemeriksaan)
	 _) pene (@@	p@n@		// (penerokaan)
	 _) penge (@@	p@N@		// (pengetahuan)
	 _) penje (@@ 	p@ndZ@		// (penjenamaan)
     _) perse (@@	p@Rs@		// (persetujuan) 


.group q
        q        k
        qu       kw

.group r
        r        R  //(jason change: R2 to r)
        r (K     r   //(jason change: R to r)
     e) r (K     *r  //(jason change: *R to r)

		r (_	 r	// jason: added (silent r at the end)

.group s
        s        s
        ss       s
        sy       S   // perhaps [S;] ??
        sj       S

     _) se (@@   s@
	 
	 //*************
	 _) se (CaiX	s@	// (sebaik)	
		sh		S
	 //***************


.group t
        t        t
        tj       tS      // Dutch

     _) ter (@@  t@*R

	 //***************
	 _) ter (@ 	 t'@*R	// ter- (terbaik, teruk)
	 //******************

.group u
        u        u
     u) u        _|u
    A_) u        _|u
	
	@) u (CX		 o		// (puluh, tudung)
	@) u (Cnya_	 'o		// (bentuknya)
	@) u (CCnya_ 'o		// (tudungnya)

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        ks
     _) x        z

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group
        $        dOl@R


    __) - (_D    n'eg@tif

        *        b'intaN
     *) * (*
        ** 
    **) * (_         _::
